Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201344-6016
Company action
level event.

(1) Company action level event means any of
the following events:

(a) The filing of a risk-based capital report by an insurer or a health
organization which indicates that:

(i) The insurer's or health organization's total adjusted capital is
greater than or equal to its regulatory action level risk-based capital but
less than its company action level risk-based capital;

(ii) If a life and health insurer or
a fraternal benefit society, the insurer or society has total adjusted capital which
is greater than or equal to its company action level risk-based capital but
less than the product of its authorized control level risk-based capital and
2.5 and has a negative trend; or

(iii) If a property and casualty insurer, the insurer has total adjusted
capital which is greater than or equal to its company action level risk-based
capital but less than the product of its authorized control level risk-based
capital and 3.0 and triggers the trend test determined in accordance with
the trend test calculation included in the property and casualty risk-based
capital instructions;

(b) The notification by the director to the insurer or health organization
of an adjusted risk-based capital report that indicates an event described
in subdivision (1)(a) of this section unless the insurer or health organization
challenges the adjusted risk-based capital report under section 44-6020; or

(c) If, pursuant to section 44-6020, the insurer or health organization
challenges an adjusted risk-based capital report that indicates an event described
in subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the notification by the director to
the insurer or health organization that the director has, after a hearing,
rejected the insurer's or health organization's challenge.

(2) In the event of a company action level event, the insurer or health
organization shall prepare and submit to the director a risk-based capital
plan which shall:

(a) Identify the conditions which contribute to the company action level
event;

(b) Contain proposals of corrective actions which the insurer or health
organization intends to take and would be expected to result in the elimination
of the company action level event;

(c) Provide projections of the insurer's or health organization's financial
results in the current year and at least the four succeeding years in the
case of an insurer or at least the two succeeding years in the case of a health
organization, both in the absence of proposed corrective actions and giving
effect to the proposed corrective actions, including projections of statutory
balance sheets, operating income, net income, capital and surplus, and risk-based
capital levels. The projections for both new and renewal business may include
separate projections for each major line of business and separately identify
each significant income, expense, and benefit component;

(d) Identify the key assumptions impacting the insurer's or health organization's
projections and the sensitivity of the projections to the assumptions; and

(e) Identify the quality of, and problems associated with, the insurer's
or health organization's business, including, but not limited to, its assets,
anticipated business growth and associated surplus strain, extraordinary exposure
to risk, and mix of business and use of reinsurance, if any, in each case.

(3) The risk-based capital plan shall be submitted:

(a) Within forty-five days after the occurrence of the company action
level event; or

(b) If the insurer or health organization challenges an adjusted risk-based
capital report pursuant to section 44-6020, within forty-five days after the
notification to the insurer or health organization that the director has,
after a hearing, rejected the insurer's or health organization's challenge.

(4) Within sixty days after the submission by an insurer or a health
organization of a risk-based capital plan to the director, the director shall
notify the insurer or health organization whether the risk-based capital plan
shall be implemented or is, in the judgment of the director, unsatisfactory.
If the director determines that the risk-based capital plan is unsatisfactory,
the notification to the insurer or health organization shall set forth the
reasons for the determination and may set forth proposed revisions which will
render the risk-based capital plan satisfactory in the judgment of the director.
Upon notification from the director, the insurer or health organization shall
prepare a revised risk-based capital plan which may incorporate by reference
any revisions proposed by the director. The insurer or health organization
shall submit the revised risk-based capital plan to the director:

(a) Within forty-five days after the notification from the director;
or

(b) If the insurer or health organization challenges the notification
from the director under section 44-6020, within forty-five days after a notification
to the insurer or health organization that the director has, after a hearing,
rejected the insurer's or health organization's challenge.

(5) In the event of a notification by the director to an insurer or
a health organization that the insurer's or health organization's risk-based
capital plan or revised risk-based capital plan is unsatisfactory, the director
may, at the director's discretion and subject to the insurer's or health organization's
right to a hearing under section 44-6020, specify in the notification that
the notification constitutes a regulatory action level event.

(6) Every domestic insurer or domestic health organization that files
a risk-based capital plan or revised risk-based capital plan with the director
shall file a copy of the risk-based capital plan or revised risk-based capital
plan with the insurance commissioner of any state in which the insurer or
health organization is authorized to do business if:

(a) Such state has a law substantially similar to subsection (1) of
section 44-6021; and

(b) The insurance commissioner of such state has notified the insurer
or health organization of its request for the filing in writing, in which
case the insurer or health organization shall file a copy of the risk-based
capital plan or revised risk-based capital plan in such state no later than
the later of:

(i) Fifteen days after the receipt of notice to file a copy of its risk-based
capital plan or revised risk-based capital plan with the state; or

(ii) The date on which the risk-based capital plan or revised risk-based
capital plan is filed under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 28;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 38;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 21;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 30;

Laws 2013, LB426, § 6.